apertium-uig.uig.twol
Alphabet

 ئ ا ە ب پ ت ج چ خ د ر ز ژ س ش غ ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ و ۇ ۆ ۈ ۋ ې ى ي ک

%{ğ%}:0
%{q%}:0
%{G%}:غ
%{Gf%}:گ
%{Gb%}:غ
%{K%}:ق
%{Kf%}:ك
%{Kb%}:ق
%{A%}:ا
%{E%}:ا
%{D%}:د
%{i%}:0
%{I%}:ى
%{U%}:ى
%{Uf%}:ۈ
%{Ub%}:ۇ
%{s%}:0
!%{n%}:0 
%{☫%}:0
%{a%}:0
%{e%}:0
%{L%}:ل
%{l%}:ل
%{û%}:ى
%{y%}:0
%{ü%}:ۈ
%>:0 ; 

Sets


Vow = ا ە و ۇ ۆ ۈ ى ې ; ! a ä o u ö ü i e

FrontVow = ە ۆ ۈ ې ; ! ä ö ü e

FrontRdVow = ۆ ۈ ;

BackRdVow = ۇ و ;

FrontUrdVow = ې ; ! ä e

BackCns = ق غ ;

Cns =  ب پ ت ج چ خ د ر ز ژ س ش غ ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ ۋ ي ئ ک ;

VoicelessCns = پ ت چ خ س ش ف ق ك ھ ;
 
VoicedCns = ي ۋ ر ل م ن ڭ ۋ ج ز ;

Abstract = %{a%} %{e%} ;


Rules

!! Epenthetic consonants

"Insert {s} after a vowel"
%{s%}:س <=> :Vow (:0) %>: _  ; 

"Insert {y} after a vowel"
%{y%}:ي <=> :Vow (:0) %>: _  ; 

!"Insert {n} before before a case ending"
!%{n%}:ن <=> _ %>: [ %{G%}: | %{Gf%}: | %{Gb%}: | %{D%}: ] ;

!! Vowel harmony

"A front"
%{Af%}:ە <=> _ ;
    except
        :Vow/:0 _ ;
        _ %>: :Cns [ :0 - %{☫%}: ]* :Vow ;
         _ :Cns %>: [ :0 - %{☫%}: ]* :Vow ;

"A back"
%{Ab%}:ا <=> _ ;
    except
        :Vow/:0 _ ;
        _ %>: :Cns [ :0 - %{☫%}: ]* :Vow ;
        _ :Cns %>: [ :0 - %{☫%}: ]* :Vow ;

"{A} becomes ە in front vowel contexts"
%{A%}:ە <=> [ :FrontVow [ :ى | :Cns ]* :Cns ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
               [ %{e%}: [ :ى | :Cns ]* :Cns ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
                                                      %{e%}: %>: _ ;
       except
          _ [ :Cns :Vow ]/:0 ;
          _ %>: :Cns [ :0 - %{☫%}: ]* :Vow ;
          _ :Cns %>: [ :0 - %{☫%}: ]* :Vow ;

"{E} becomes ە in front vowel contexts"
%{E%}:ە <=> [ :FrontVow [ :ى | :Cns ]* :Cns ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
               [ %{e%}: [ :ى | :Cns ]* :Cns ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
        except
            ! except after a vowel, where it becomes ي
            :Vow/:0 _ ;
            ! except in environments when it reduces to ى
            _ %>: :Cns [ :0 - %{☫%}: ]* :Vow ;
            _ :Cns %>: [ :0 - %{☫%}: ]* :Vow ;

"{ü} becomes [u] after back vowels/cns"
%{ü%}:ۇ <=> :BackCns _ ;

"{E} becomes ي after vowels"
%{E%}:ي <=> :Vow/:0 _ ;

"{A} deletes after vowels"
%{A%}:0 <=> :Vow/:0 _ ;

!"{Af} deletes after vowels"
!%{Af%}:0 <=> :Vow/:0 _ ;

!"{Ab} deletes after vowels"
!%{Ab%}:0 <=> :Vow/:0 _ ;

"{i} epenthesis"
%{i%}:ى <=> :Cns (:0) %>: _ ;

!"{i} vowel harmony"
! not actually needed?
!%{i%}:Vy <=> [ :Vx :Cns* :Cns ]/:0 _ ;  ! null after :Vow
!         where Vx in ( و ۇ ۆ ۈ )
!               Vy in ( ۇ ۇ ۈ ۈ )
!         matched ;

!"{I} rounding harmony"
!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :Vx :Cns* :Cns ]/:0 _ ;  ! null after :Vow 
!         where Vx in ( و ۇ ۆ ۈ )
!               Vy in ( ۇ ۇ ۈ ۈ )
!         matched ;

!"{U} rounding harmony"
!%{U%}:Vy <=> [ :Vx :Cns* :Cns ]/:0 _ ;  ! null after :Vow 
!         where Vx in ( و ۇ ۆ ۈ )
!               Vy in ( ۇ ۇ ۈ ۈ )
!         matched ;

"{û} deletion"
%{û%}:0 <=> _ Cns: %>: (:0) :Vow ;

"{û}:u harmony"
%{û%}:ۇ <=> BackRdVow: Cns: _ Cns: .#. ;

"{û}:y harmony"
%{û%}:ۈ <=> FrontRdVow: Cns: _ Cns: .#. ;

"{û}:e harmony"
%{û%}:ە <=> FrontUrdVow: Cns: _ Cns: .#. ;

"Delete {I} after vowels"
%{I%}:0 <=> :Vow/:0 _ ;

"Delete {U} after vowels"
%{U%}:0 <=> :Vow/:0 _ ;


!! Consonant assimilation

"Devoice {D} after a voiceless consonant"
%{D%}:ت <=> :VoicelessCns (:0) %>: _  ; 
%{q%}: %>: _ ; 
	except
%{ğ%}: %>: _ ;

!! Cons-vowel interaction

"{K} to ك after front vowel"
%{K%}:ك <=> :FrontVow/:0 _ ;
:FrontVow (:Cns) %>: :Cns :ى _ ;

"{G} to گ after front vowel"
%{G%}:گ <=> [ :FrontVow (:VoicedCns) ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
                 [ :VoicedCns %{e%}: ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
               :Vow %>: _ :FrontVow ;
:Vow %{e%}: %>: _ ; 
%{ğ%}: %>: _ ; 

"{G} to ك after front vowel and voiceless consonant"
%{G%}:ك <=> [ :FrontVow [ :Cns | :ى ]* :VoicelessCns ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
               [ %{e%}: [ :Cns | :ى ]* :VoicelessCns ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
:VoicelessCns %{e%}: %>: _ ;
	except
%{ğ%}: %>: _ ;

"{G} to ق after voiceless consonant"
%{G%}:ق <=> :VoicelessCns/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
 [ :VoicelessCns %{a%}: ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
%{q%}: %>: _ ; 
        except
            [ :FrontVow [ :Cns | :ى ]* :VoicelessCns ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
               [ %{e%}: [ :Cns | :ى ]* :VoicelessCns ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;

"{Gf} to ك after voiceless consonant"
%{Gf%}:ك <=> :VoicelessCns ( %>: ) _ ;
	except
%{ğ%}: %>: _ ;
:ق ( %>: ) _ ;

"{Gf} to ق after ق"
%{Gf%}:ق <=> :ق ( %>: ) _ ;

"{Gb} to ق after voiceless consonant"
%{Gb%}:ق <=> :VoicelessCns ( %>: ) _ ;

!! Vowel reduction and regressive umlaut

"ا and ە reduce to ى in non-initial and non-final open syllables"
Vx:ى <=> _ %>: :Cns [ :0 - %{☫%}: ]* :Vow ;
         _ :Cns %>: [ :0 - %{☫%}: ]* :Vow ;
     except
         .#. :Cns*/:0 _ ;
     where Vx in ( ا ە ) ;

!"{A} becomes reduced vowel in non-initial and non-final open syllables"
![ %{Af%}:ى | %{Ab%}:ى ] <=> _ %>: :Cns [ :0 - %{☫%}: ]* :Vow ;
!            _ :Cns %>: [ :0 - %{☫%}: ]* :Vow ;
!     except
!         ! except in initial syllables
!         .#. :Cns*/:0 _ ;
!         ! except after vowels, where {A} deletes
!              :Vow/:0 _ ;

"{A} becomes reduced vowel in non-initial and non-final open syllables"
%{A%}:ى  <=> _ %>: :Cns [ :0 - %{☫%}: ]* :Vow ;
            _ :Cns %>: [ :0 - %{☫%}: ]* :Vow ;
     except
         ! except in initial syllables
         .#. :Cns*/:0 _ ;
         ! except after vowels, where {A} deletes
              :Vow/:0 _ ;

"{E} becomes reduced vowel in non-initial and non-final open syllables"
%{E%}:ى <=> _ %>: :Cns [ :0 - %{☫%}: ]* :Vow ;
            _ :Cns %>: [ :0 - %{☫%}: ]* :Vow ;
     except
            ! except after a vowel, where it becomes ي
            :Vow/:0 _ ;


!"test"
!ا:ى <=> _ [ :Cns :Vow ]/:0 ;

"ا and ە to ې in initial open syllables preceding ى"
Vx:ې <=> .#. :Cns*/:0 _ [ %>: :Cns [ :ى | %{I%}: ] ]/[ :0 - [ %{☫%}: | %>: ] ] ;
         .#. :Cns*/:0 _ [ :Cns %>: [ :ى | %{I%}: ] ]/[ :0 - [ %{☫%}: | %>: ] ] ;
     where Vx in ( ا ە ) ;


"{L} to ن after ل"
%{L%}:ن <=> [ :ل :Vow ]/:0 _ ;


"{l} deletion in -ptu context"
%{l%}:0 => _ %>: %{U%}:/:0 :پ %>: :ت  ; 

"{l} deletion in -ptu context f"
%{l%}:0 => _ %>: %{Uf%}:/:0 :پ %>: :ت  ; 

"{l} deletion in -ptu context b"
%{l%}:0 => _ %>: %{Ub%}:/:0 :پ %>: :ت  ; 
